Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-611
Bicycle, defined.

Bicycle shall mean:

(1) Every device propelled solely by human power, upon which any person may ride, and having two, three, or four wheels any one or more of which being more than fourteen inches in diameter; and

(2) An electric bicycle.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 107;

Laws 2015, LB95, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 37.